Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-168
Boards; conflict of interest.

The department may establish definitions of conflicts of interest for members of the boards and may establish procedures in the case such a conflict arises. For purposes of this section, conflict of interest includes financial, professional, or personal obligations that may compromise or present the appearance of compromising the judgment of a member in the performance of his or her duties.

Laws 1982, LB 448, § 5;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 10;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 19;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-115.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 68.